Akito
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: 2012 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for his technical prowess.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and mat-based techniques.
Signature moves: Figure-Four Leglock, Scorpion Deathlock, Arm Capture Suplex.
Brief description: Akito has been a consistent performer in DDT Pro-Wrestling since his debut in 2012. His technical wrestling style and submission expertise have made him a respected competitor. Akito has been involved in various storylines and has challenged for multiple championships, showcasing his versatility and dedication to the promotion.

ALL OUT
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: 2017 to 2020.
Position on the card: Stable featuring members in various card positions, from mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Diverse styles, including high-flying, technical, and power-based wrestling.
Signature moves: Varied among members; notable moves include Running Knee Strikes, German Suplexes, and Lariats.
Brief description: ALL OUT was a prominent stable in DDT Pro-Wrestling, formed by Konosuke Takeshita and Akito in 2017. The group aimed to embody a fighting spirit and showcased a mix of wrestling styles. They engaged in notable feuds with other factions and were involved in significant matches, contributing to the dynamic storytelling within DDT. The stable disbanded in 2020, with members pursuing individual careers.​

Aja Kong
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2015 to 2019.
Position on the card: Special attraction, often featured in high-profile matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with strong-style striking and dominance.
Signature moves: Uraken (Spinning Backfist), Brainbuster, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Aja Kong, a legendary figure in Japanese women's wrestling, made several notable appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling. Her matches were special attractions, highlighting her enduring charisma and in-ring prowess. Kong's involvement added prestige to DDT events and showcased the promotion's diverse talent collaborations.​

Akane Fujita
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, primarily in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in women's division matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with a focus on striking and weapon-based offense.
Signature moves: Lariat, Death Valley Driver, Diving Senton.
Brief description: Akane Fujita, known for her hardcore wrestling style, made appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling's women's division. Her matches often involved intense physicality and showcased her resilience. Fujita's involvement added a unique dynamic to the promotion's events, appealing to fans of hardcore wrestling.​

Akebono
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2013 to 2015.
Position on the card: Special attraction, featured in main events and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with sumo influences, utilizing size and strength.
Signature moves: Yokozuna Press, Body Avalanche, Chokeslam.
Brief description: Akebono, a former sumo grand champion, brought his immense presence to DDT Pro-Wrestling in several special appearances. His matches capitalized on his size and strength, often teaming with or against top DDT talents. Akebono's involvement provided a crossover appeal, attracting sumo fans to professional wrestling events.​

Akira Jo
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card, involved in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Lariat, German Suplex, Cross Armbreaker.
Brief description: Akira Jo made limited appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, showcasing a strong style approach. His matches were characterized by stiff strikes and technical grappling, aligning with the hard-hitting style popular in Japanese wrestling. While his time in DDT was brief, he left an impression with his intense in-ring style.​

Akira Raijin
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style with an emphasis on power moves.
Signature moves: Lariat, Powerbomb, Spear.
Brief description: Akira Raijin, also known as Kiyoshi, made brief appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling. Bringing experience from other promotions, he showcased a powerful wrestling style. His involvement added variety to DDT's roster during his appearances.​

Alien Guts
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2014.
Position on the card: Comedy character, featured in opening matches.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox, comedic wrestling with theatrical elements.
Signature moves: Alien Splash, Tentacle Hold, Cosmic Drop.
Brief description: Alien Guts was a comedic character in DDT Pro-Wrestling, embodying the promotion's penchant for blending humor with wrestling. The character's matches were lighthearted, focusing on entertainment and audience engagement. Alien Guts added to the diverse array of personas that make DDT unique.​

Aloha World Order
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2015.
Position on the card: Comedy stable, typically featured in opening or mid-card segments.
Wrestling style: Humorous and parody-driven, blending light in-ring action with exaggerated theatrics.
Signature moves: Hawaiian Hammer, Aloha Chop, Surfboard Stretch.
Brief description: Aloha World Order was a short-lived parody stable in DDT Pro-Wrestling, playing off the infamous nWo gimmick with a tropical twist. Their segments leaned heavily on comedy, costume gimmicks, and crowd interaction, embodying DDT's signature balance between wrestling and entertainment. Though not active in major storylines, they were memorable for their satire and colorfully absurd presentation.

A. YAZAWA
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Charismatic showman with a blend of technical and high-flying maneuvers.
Signature moves: YAZAWA Elbow Drop, Swinging Neckbreaker, Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: A. YAZAWA made brief appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, bringing a flamboyant and entertaining style to the ring. His persona was reminiscent of rock 'n' roll icons, adding a unique flair to his performances. While his time in DDT was limited, he left a memorable impression with his energetic charisma.

Abdullah Kobayashi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances between 2006 and 2010.
Position on the card: Special attraction, featured in hardcore and deathmatch-style bouts.
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with an emphasis on brutal, weapon-based offense.
Signature moves: Zebra Driver (Piledriver), Diving Body Press, Various weapon-assisted maneuvers.
Brief description: Abdullah Kobayashi, renowned for his hardcore wrestling style, made several appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, often participating in deathmatches that highlighted his tolerance for pain and unorthodox offense. His contributions added a hardcore element to DDT's diverse match offerings.​

American Balloon
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily featured in comedic matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with exaggerated mannerisms.
Signature moves: Balloon Splash, Inflatable Elbow Drop.
Brief description: American Balloon made a notable impact in DDT Pro-Wrestling with his comedic persona and entertaining antics. His matches often involved humor and audience interaction, aligning with DDT's unique blend of wrestling and entertainment.​

Andreza Giant Panda
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Special appearance in 2019.
Position on the card: Main event attraction.
Wrestling style: Character-based performance with limited mobility.
Signature moves: Panda Splash, Bear Hug.
Brief description: Andreza Giant Panda captivated audiences with a unique appearance at DDT's "Wrestle Peter Pan 2019" event, facing Super Sasadango Machine. The match showcased DDT's flair for blending spectacle with wrestling, drawing significant attention.

Antonio Honda
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: 2005 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for comedic storytelling.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with storytelling elements.
Signature moves: Bionic Elbow, Gongitsune (Fox Spirit).
Brief description: Antonio Honda has been a staple in DDT, renowned for his comedic timing and storytelling within matches. His "Gongitsune" routine, involving humorous anecdotes and audience engagement, has made him a fan favorite.​

ASUKA
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2018 to 2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Moonsault, German Suplex.
Brief description: ASUKA, also known as Veny, made impactful appearances in DDT, showcasing athleticism and charisma. As one of the few openly transgender wrestlers in Japan, ASUKA has been a trailblazer, gaining recognition both domestically and internationally.

Atsushi Aoki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and mat-based techniques.
Signature moves: Arm Lock, Crossface, German Suplex.
Brief description: Atsushi Aoki made limited appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, showcasing his technical prowess. His involvement added depth to the mid-card scene during his tenure.​

Atsushi Kotoge
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2009.
Position on the card: Mid-card, involved in singles competition.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Knee Kick, Moonsault Press, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Atsushi Kotoge's brief stint in DDT Pro-Wrestling highlighted his agility and technical skills, contributing to the promotion's dynamic wrestling style.​

Atsushi Maruyama
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances between 2016 and 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Backdrop Suplex, Diving Headbutt, Octopus Hold.
Brief description: Atsushi Maruyama brought a blend of technical skill and humor to his DDT appearances, aligning with the promotion's eclectic style.​

Atsushi Onita
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2014 to 2017.
Position on the card: Special attraction, featured in main events and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with emphasis on brawling and weapon use.
Signature moves: Thunder Fire Powerbomb, Piledriver, Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Atsushi Onita, a pioneer of hardcore wrestling in Japan, made notable appearances in DDT, bringing his signature hardcore style to the promotion's major events.​

Azusa Takigawa
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2015 to 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, active in the women's division.
Wrestling style: Traditional joshi puroresu with a focus on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Diving Crossbody, Boston Crab, Dropkick.
Brief description: Azusa Takigawa was a prominent figure in DDT's women's division, known for her resilience and in-ring charisma.​


Baliyan Akki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Superkick, Arm Drag.
Brief description: Baliyan Akki's appearances in DDT showcased his versatility and athleticism, adding an international flair to the promotion.

Banana Senga
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2010 to 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily featured in comedic matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with high-flying maneuvers.
Signature moves: Banana Split (Split-Legged Moonsault), Peel-Out (Suicide Dive).
Brief description: Banana Senga was known for his comedic persona, often incorporating banana-themed antics into his matches. His lighthearted approach provided comic relief and endeared him to fans seeking entertainment beyond traditional wrestling.​
Wikipedia

Basara
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2015 to 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style with martial arts influences.
Signature moves: Basara Bomb (Sitout Powerbomb), Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Basara showcased a hard-hitting style, blending traditional wrestling with martial arts strikes. His tenure in DDT added a unique flavor to the promotion's diverse roster, appealing to fans of intense, physical wrestling.​

Batten Tamagawa
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances between 2008 and 2012.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often involved in comedic storylines.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with traditional Japanese gimmicks.
Signature moves: Tamagawa Splash (Diving Splash), Rolling Onigiri (Rolling Elbow).
Brief description: Batten Tamagawa's character was steeped in Japanese cultural references, providing a humorous take that resonated with local audiences. His performances often involved slapstick comedy, making him a memorable figure in DDT's eclectic history.​

Bear Fukuda
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular competitor from 2004 to 2008.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for his powerhouse persona.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestling with brawling techniques.
Signature moves: Bear Hug, Lariat, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: Bear Fukuda was recognized for his imposing physique and strength, often dominating opponents with sheer power. His tenure in DDT solidified him as a formidable competitor, contributing to the promotion's reputation for diverse wrestling styles.​

Bernard Ackah
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2012 to 2014.
Position on the card: Special attraction, featured in crossover events.
Wrestling style: Striker with a background in kickboxing and mixed martial arts.
Signature moves: High Kick, Spinning Backfist, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Bernard Ackah brought a unique blend of combat sports experience to DDT, participating in special attraction matches that highlighted his striking prowess. His crossover appeal attracted fans from various combat sports disciplines.​
Cagematch

Best Stretchman Amazon
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2017 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, involved in comedic tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with exaggerated stretching routines.
Signature moves: Stretch Hold, Elastic Lariat.
Brief description: Best Stretchman Amazon was part of a comedic duo known for their flexibility-themed gimmick, entertaining audiences with over-the-top stretching antics and humorous in-ring performances.​

Best Stretchman V
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2017 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, partnered with Best Stretchman Amazon.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling focusing on flexibility and stretching.
Signature moves: Stretch Kick, Limber Lock.
Brief description: As part of the Best Stretchman duo, Best Stretchman V complemented his partner with synchronized stretching routines, adding a unique comedic element to DDT's diverse entertainment offerings.​

Big Rude
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card, portrayed as a villainous character.
Wrestling style: Brawler with underhanded tactics.
Signature moves: Low Blow, Eye Rake, DDT.
Brief description: Big Rude's character embodied the classic heel persona, utilizing dirty tactics to gain the upper hand, thereby engaging audiences through his antagonistic approach.​

Biomonster DNA
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2009 to 2011.
Position on the card: Special attraction, featured in monster-themed matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with supernatural elements.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Monster Splash.
Brief description: Biomonster DNA was a character shrouded in mystery, often portrayed as an unstoppable force, adding a fantastical element to DDT's storytelling.​
Wikipedia

Black Ribera
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2008.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participated in singles matches.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Ribera Lock (Armbar), Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Black Ribera's technical proficiency added a layer of wrestling purity to his matches, appealing to fans appreciative of classic wrestling techniques.

Bungee Takada
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances between 2000 and 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily featured in comedic matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Bungee Jump (Diving Splash), Springboard Dropkick.
Brief description: Bungee Takada was known for his humorous persona, often incorporating bungee jumping themes into his performances. His lighthearted approach provided comic relief and aligned with DDT's unique blend of wrestling and entertainment.​

Burning
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2018 to present.
Position on the card: Stable featuring members in various card positions, from mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Diverse styles, including technical wrestling, high-flying, and strong style.
Signature moves: Varied among members; notable moves include Lariats, German Suplexes, and Diving Elbow Drops.
Brief description: Burning is a prominent stable in DDT Pro-Wrestling, originally formed in All Japan Pro Wrestling and later re-established in DDT. The group comprises seasoned wrestlers who bring a wealth of experience and skill to the promotion, engaging in notable feuds and championship pursuits that have significantly contributed to DDT's dynamic storytelling.​

Cavalry
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Tag team featured in mid-card matches.
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team wrestling with a focus on teamwork and technical skills.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Tandem Dropkick.
Brief description: Cavalry, consisting of Ryo Kawamura and Ryota Nakatsu, made appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, showcasing solid tag team dynamics. Their involvement added depth to the tag team division, emphasizing classic wrestling techniques and strategy.​

Cherry
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2005 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, active in the women's division.
Wrestling style: Traditional joshi puroresu with a focus on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Cherry Bomb (Diving Crossbody), Boston Crab, Dropkick.
Brief description: Cherry has been a consistent presence in DDT's women's division, known for her resilience and in-ring charisma. Her contributions have been integral to the development and visibility of female talent within the promotion.

Chris Brookes
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2019 to present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, involved in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Octopus Stretch, Praying Mantis Bomb (Double Underhook Piledriver), Slingshot Cutter.
Brief description: Chris Brookes, a British wrestler known for his technical prowess and unique in-ring style, became a prominent figure in DDT Pro-Wrestling starting in 2019. His adaptability and charisma have led to significant matches and championship pursuits, enhancing the promotion's international appeal.​

CIMA
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, notably in 2019 during cross-promotional events.
Position on the card: Main event, featured as a special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling with strong lucha libre influences.
Signature moves: Meteora (Double Knee Drop), Schwein (Modified Driver), Iconoclasm (Turnbuckle Slam).
Brief description: CIMA, a veteran of the Japanese wrestling scene and leader of the #StrongHearts stable, made notable appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling during cross-promotional events. His involvement brought a dynamic style and expanded DDT's collaborative efforts within the wrestling industry.​

Chon Shiryu
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2006 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card, active in the singles and tag team divisions.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Dragon Rana, Springboard Moonsault, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Chon Shiryu, known for his high-flying maneuvers and lucha libre style, was a regular competitor in DDT Pro-Wrestling between 2006 and 2010. His energetic performances and unique offense added excitement to the promotion's mid-card scene.​

Colt Cabana
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, notably in 2012 and 2013.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, involved in singles and comedic matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling blended with technical and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Chicago Skyline (Top Rope Swinging Neckbreaker), Flying Apple (Corner Butt Attack), Superman Pin.
Brief description: Colt Cabana, an American wrestler renowned for his comedic style, made notable appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, aligning with the promotion's entertainment-centric approach. His charisma and in-ring versatility resonated with the DDT audience, contributing to memorable matches and segments.

Dai Suzuki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2016 to 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Armbar, German Suplex, Dropkick.
Brief description: Dai Suzuki was known for his technical prowess and resilience. His contributions added depth to the mid-card scene, and he was recognized for his dedication to honing his craft.​

Daichi Kakimoto
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular competitor from 2004 to 2009.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, involved in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Strong style with an emphasis on strikes and power moves.
Signature moves: Lariat, Brainbuster, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Daichi Kakimoto was a prominent figure in DDT during his tenure, known for his hard-hitting style and intense matches. His presence elevated the competitive nature of the promotion's roster.​

Daiki Shimomura
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances between 2016 and 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Hurricanrana, Superkick.
Brief description: Daiki Shimomura brought agility and excitement to his matches, showcasing a blend of aerial maneuvers and technical skills that resonated with fans.​

Daisuke Masaoka
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2014 to 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in hardcore and deathmatch scenarios.
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with high-risk spots.
Signature moves: Diving Headbutt, Swanton Bomb, Chair Shot.
Brief description: Daisuke Masaoka was known for his fearless approach to hardcore wrestling, often engaging in brutal matches that showcased his toughness and willingness to push boundaries.​

Daisuke Sasaki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular competitor from 2012 to present.
Position on the card: Main event, leader of the DAMNATION and DAMNATION T.A stables.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Crossface Lock, Sasaki Hurricanrana, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Daisuke Sasaki has been a central figure in DDT, leading influential stables like DAMNATION and its successor, DAMNATION T.A. His charisma and in-ring versatility have made him a cornerstone of the promotion.​

Daisuke Sekimoto
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2005 to 2019.
Position on the card: Main event, featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style with an emphasis on power moves.
Signature moves: Deadlift German Suplex, Lariat, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Daisuke Sekimoto's appearances in DDT showcased his immense strength and powerful wrestling style, adding a formidable presence to the promotion's events.​

DAMNATION
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2016 to 2021.
Position on the card: Heel stable, involved in main event storylines and championship pursuits.
Wrestling style: Diverse styles among members, including technical, high-flying, and power wrestling.
Signature moves: Various, depending on individual members.
Brief description: DAMNATION was a dominant heel stable led by Daisuke Sasaki, known for its rebellious attitude and significant impact on DDT's narrative arcs. The group's influence was felt across multiple championship reigns and high-profile feuds.​

DAMNATION T.A
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2022 to present.
Position on the card: Heel stable, continuing the legacy of the original DAMNATION faction.
Wrestling style: Varied among members, maintaining a blend of technical prowess and aggressive tactics.
Signature moves: Various, tailored to individual wrestlers within the stable.
Brief description: DAMNATION T.A serves as the spiritual successor to the original DAMNATION stable, upholding its rebellious ethos and continuing to play a pivotal role in DDT's storylines.​

Danshoku Dino
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2002 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, known for comedic and controversial performances.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with provocative antics.
Signature moves: Danshoku Driver (Piledriver), Lip Lock (Kiss-based immobilization).
Brief description: Danshoku Dino is a cornerstone of DDT's comedic approach, utilizing his flamboyant persona to entertain and challenge traditional wrestling norms. His unique character has made him both a controversial and beloved figure in the promotion.​

DASH Chisako
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, primarily in cross-promotional events.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in women's division matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and hard-hitting joshi puroresu.
Signature moves: Hormone Splash (Diving Frog Splash), Hormone Bomb (Diving Senton).
Brief description: DASH Chisako, primarily associated with Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling, has made occasional appearances in DDT, showcasing her dynamic in-ring abilities and contributing to the promotion's diverse match offerings.​

Dick Togo
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2009 to 2016.
Position on the card: Main event, recognized as a seasoned veteran.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Senton Bomb, Crossface Chickenwing.
Brief description: Dick Togo, a respected figure in Japanese wrestling, brought his extensive experience to DDT, elevating match quality and mentoring younger talent during his appearances.​

DISASTER BOX
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active primarily during the early 2000s.
Position on the card: Stable involved in various card positions, known for their unity and resilience.
Wrestling style: Diverse, with members showcasing technical, high-flying, and power-based styles.
Signature moves: Varied among members; often utilized coordinated team maneuvers.
Brief description: DISASTER BOX was a prominent stable in DDT, known for their strong camaraderie and significant impact on the promotion's storylines during their active years.​

DJ Nira
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from the early 2000s to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often involved in comedic segments.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with DJ-themed gimmicks.
Signature moves: Turntable Spin (Spinning Elbow Drop), Beat Drop (Leg Drop).
Brief description: DJ Nira adds a musical flair to DDT's events, blending his DJ persona with in-ring antics to entertain audiences and provide lighthearted moments.

El Generico
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Semi-regular appearances from 2011 to 2012.
Position on the card: Main event, capturing the promotion's top title.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling with lucha libre influences.
Signature moves: Brainbustaaahhh!!! (Top Rope Brainbuster), Helluva Kick (Running Big Boot), Topé con Hilo (Over-the-Top-Rope Somersault Dive).
Brief description: El Generico, known for his energetic and crowd-pleasing style, made a significant impact during his tenure in DDT Pro-Wrestling. He won the KO-D Openweight Championship on September 30, 2012, by defeating Kota Ibushi, and successfully defended it against notable opponents before losing the title to Kenny Omega on December 23, 2012. ​

Emi Sakura
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, notably in 2012.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in intergender and comedy matches.
Wrestling style: Traditional joshi puroresu with a blend of comedy elements.
Signature moves: La Magistral (Rolling Cradle Pin), Moonsault Press, Dragon Sleeper.
Brief description: Emi Sakura, a veteran of the Japanese wrestling scene and founder of the Ice Ribbon promotion, made appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling that showcased her versatility and willingness to engage in the promotion's unique blend of wrestling and entertainment. Her involvement added depth to DDT's diverse roster and provided memorable moments for fans. 

Eruption
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2020 to 2024.
Position on the card: Stable involved in various card positions, with members participating in both mid-card and main event matches.
Wrestling style: Diverse styles among members, including strong style, technical wrestling, and striking.
Signature moves: Varied among members; often utilized coordinated team maneuvers.
Brief description: Eruption was a prominent stable in DDT Pro-Wrestling, comprising members such as Saki Akai, Yukio Sakaguchi, Hideki Okatani, and Kazusada Higuchi. The group was known for its cohesive teamwork and significant impact on DDT's narrative arcs during their active years. 

Fuminori Abe
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2016 to present, primarily under the Pro-Wrestling Basara branch.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with strong striking ability.
Signature moves: Various submission holds, stiff kicks, and suplex variations.
Brief description: Fuminori Abe, also known as Taido Abe, is a Japanese professional wrestler and former mixed martial artist. He has competed across various promotions, including DDT Pro-Wrestling, where he has showcased his technical prowess and striking skills. Abe has held titles such as the Iron Fist Tag Team Championship and Union MAX Championship in Pro-Wrestling Basara. ​

GENTARO
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2000 to 2012, with sporadic appearances thereafter.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, involved in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on mat-based grappling and submissions.
Signature moves: GENTARO Clutch (Modified Roll-Up), Figure-Four Leglock, German Suplex.
Brief description: GENTARO was a prominent figure in DDT Pro-Wrestling, known for his technical prowess and adaptability. He held the DDT Extreme Division Championship, showcasing his versatility across various match types. His contributions significantly influenced DDT's in-ring style during his tenure.​

Go Shiozaki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, notably in 2013.
Position on the card: Main event, featured as a special attraction.
Wrestling style: Strong style with powerful chops and lariats.
Signature moves: Go Flasher (Modified Fisherman Driver), Gowan Lariat, Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Go Shiozaki, primarily associated with Pro Wrestling Noah, made notable appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, bringing his hard-hitting style to the promotion. His matches added a different dynamic to DDT's events, blending traditional strong style with DDT's unique entertainment approach.

Golden☆Lovers
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2009 to 2014.
Position on the card: Main event, capturing the promotion's top tag team titles.
Wrestling style: A blend of high-flying maneuvers and technical prowess.
Signature moves: Golden Shower (Simultaneous 450° splashes), Cross Slash (Simultaneous springboard moonsaults to the outside).
Brief description: The Golden☆Lovers, consisting of Kenny Omega and Kota Ibushi, formed in January 2009 in DDT Pro-Wrestling. They quickly became one of the promotion's top tag teams, winning the KO-D Tag Team Championship twice. Their dynamic in-ring chemistry and innovative offense made them a standout duo in DDT and later in other promotions. ​

Gota Ihashi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2009 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often involved in comedic matches and storylines.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with occasional high-flying moves.
Signature moves: Moonsault Press, Leg Lariat.
Brief description: Gota Ihashi, known for his comedic persona and entertaining antics, has been a staple in DDT Pro-Wrestling since his debut in 2009. Despite his larger physique, he surprises audiences with agile maneuvers like the Moonsault Press. Ihashi often portrays a parody of Kota Ibushi, adding a unique flavor to his character.

Gorgeous Matsuno
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2004 to present.
Position on the card: Opening matches and comedic segments.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with a focus on entertainment.
Signature moves: Gorgeous Superstar (Diving Elbow Drop), Gorgeous DDT.
Brief description: Gorgeous Matsuno is a veteran entertainer in DDT, known for his flamboyant persona and comedic wrestling style. Often opening shows, he sets the tone with lighthearted performances that engage the audience.​

Gouma Ryu
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2010 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in comedic or specialty matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with legal-themed gimmicks.
Signature moves: Cross Examination (Submission Hold), Objection! (Striking Move).
Brief description: Gouma Ryu, portraying a lawyer character, brings a unique legal twist to his matches. His gimmick involves "prosecuting" opponents in the ring, adding a humorous narrative to his bouts.​

Gran MilliMeters
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2015 to 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced offense.
Signature moves: Double Moonsault, Stereo Superkicks.
Brief description: Gran MilliMeters was a tag team known for their synchronized high-flying maneuvers and quick pacing. Their matches were crowd-pleasers, showcasing agility and teamwork.​

Great Kojika
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Guest appearances from 2005 to 2010.
Position on the card: Special attraction, often in legends matches.
Wrestling style: Traditional Japanese wrestling with a focus on storytelling.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Big Boot.
Brief description: Great Kojika, a legendary figure in Japanese wrestling, made special appearances in DDT, bringing his decades of experience to the promotion. His involvement added prestige and a sense of history to the events.​

Great Sasuke
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2004 to 2012.
Position on the card: Special attraction, featured in high-profile matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Senton Atomico, Thunder Fire Powerbomb.
Brief description: The Great Sasuke, renowned for his contributions to Japanese wrestling and lucha libre style, brought his high-flying offense to DDT on several occasions, enhancing the promotion's diversity and appeal.​

HARASHIMA
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2001 to present.
Position on the card: Main event, serving as the promotion's ace and holding multiple championships.
Wrestling style: Versatile, combining technical prowess with striking and high-flying maneuvers.
Signature moves: Somato (Running Double Knee Strike), Falcon Arrow, Diving Double Foot Stomp.
Brief description: Debuting in 2001 under the ring name "HERO!", HARASHIMA has been a cornerstone of DDT Pro-Wrestling. He unmasked and adopted his current ring name in 2006, quickly ascending to the top of the promotion. HARASHIMA has held the KO-D Openweight Championship multiple times, establishing himself as one of DDT's most reliable and skilled performers. His adaptability and consistent match quality have earned him recognition as the promotion's ace. ​

HAYATA
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances between 2016 and 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling with a focus on agility.
Signature moves: Headache (Diving Headbutt), Moonsault Press, Handspring Back Elbow.
Brief description: HAYATA began his career in 2006 and gained prominence in various Japanese promotions. His appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling showcased his agility and technical skills, contributing to the promotion's dynamic junior heavyweight division. ​

Gota Ihashi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2009 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often involved in comedic matches and storylines.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with occasional high-flying moves.
Signature moves: Moonsault Press, Leg Lariat.
Brief description: Gota Ihashi, known for his comedic persona and entertaining antics, has been a staple in DDT Pro-Wrestling since his debut in 2009. Despite his larger physique, he surprises audiences with agile maneuvers like the Moonsault Press. Ihashi often portrays a parody of Kota Ibushi, adding a unique flavor to his character.​

Gorgeous Matsuno
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances from 2004 to present.
Position on the card: Opening matches and comedic segments.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with a focus on entertainment.
Signature moves: Gorgeous Superstar (Diving Elbow Drop), Gorgeous DDT.
Brief description: Gorgeous Matsuno is a veteran entertainer in DDT, known for his flamboyant persona and comedic wrestling style. Often opening shows, he sets the tone with lighthearted performances that engage the audience.​

Gouma Ryu
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2010 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in comedic or specialty matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with legal-themed gimmicks.
Signature moves: Cross Examination (Submission Hold), Objection! (Striking Move).
Brief description: Gouma Ryu, portraying a lawyer character, adds a unique comedic element to DDT events. His legal jargon-infused promos and in-ring style provide humor and variety to the shows.​

Great Kojika
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, notably in the early 2000s.
Position on the card: Special attraction, often in comedic or legends matches.
Wrestling style: Traditional Japanese wrestling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Lariat.
Brief description: Great Kojika, one of Japan's oldest active wrestlers, brought his decades of experience to DDT in special appearances. His involvement added a sense of nostalgia and respect for wrestling history.​

Great Sasuke
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, primarily in the mid-2000s.
Position on the card: Special attraction, featured in high-profile matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and martial arts-influenced offense.
Signature moves: Senton Atomico, Thunder Fire Powerbomb.
Brief description: The Great Sasuke, a legendary figure in Japanese wrestling, made notable appearances in DDT, showcasing his innovative high-flying style and contributing to the promotion's reputation for diverse wrestling styles.

HERO!
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2001 to 2006.
Position on the card: Main event, serving as one of the promotion's top stars.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Somato (Running double knee strike), Falcon Arrow, Diving double foot stomp.
Brief description: HERO!, later known as HARASHIMA, was a pivotal figure in DDT Pro-Wrestling during the early 2000s. His dynamic in-ring style and charisma elevated him to main event status, where he captured multiple championships and became a cornerstone of the promotion.​

Hideki Okatani
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2020 and is currently active.
Position on the card: Mid-card, with involvement in tag team and faction-based matches.
Wrestling style: Fundamental-based wrestling with a focus on technical skills.
Signature moves: Various suplexes and submission holds.
Brief description: Since his debut, Hideki Okatani has been a promising talent in DDT Pro-Wrestling. As a member of the Damnation T.A. stable, he has shown steady improvement and continues to develop his in-ring abilities.​

Hikaru Sato
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances between 2008 and 2012.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often participating in technical wrestling bouts.
Wrestling style: Shoot-style wrestling with a focus on submissions and strikes.
Signature moves: Cross armbreaker, various kick variations.
Brief description: Hikaru Sato, known for his shoot-style wrestling, made several appearances in DDT, showcasing his submission-based offense and martial arts background.​

Hirata Collection A.T.
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2008 to 2012.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily featured in comedic matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with an emphasis on entertainment.
Signature moves: Dancing-based maneuvers, roll-ups.
Brief description: Hirata Collection A.T. was known for his comedic persona, often incorporating dance routines into his matches, providing a lighthearted and entertaining element to DDT events.

Hisaya Imabayashi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2005 to present.
Position on the card: On-air authority figure, serving as the General Manager.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: Hisaya Imabayashi has been a prominent figure in DDT Pro-Wrestling's management, serving as the General Manager. He is responsible for match-making decisions and often appears in on-screen segments to enforce rules and maintain order during events. ​

Hiroshi Yamato
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances as a freelancer.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Bomb, Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Hiroshi Yamato is a freelance wrestler known for his high-flying and technical prowess. He has made occasional appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, adding depth to the mid-card with his versatile in-ring style.

Hoshitango
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2006 to 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in comedic matches.
Wrestling style: Sumo-based offense with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Sumo Thrusts, Body Avalanche.
Brief description: Hoshitango, originally from Argentina, transitioned from sumo wrestling to professional wrestling. In DDT, he was known for incorporating sumo techniques into his matches, often participating in comedic bouts that highlighted his unique background.​

Ilusion
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2021 and is currently active.
Position on the card: Mid-card, competing in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre-inspired maneuvers.
Signature moves: Swanton Bomb, RE:VISION1.
Brief description: Ilusion is a young talent in DDT Pro-Wrestling, known for his agility and high-risk maneuvers. Since his debut, he has been building his reputation in the promotion's junior heavyweight division.

Isami Kodaka
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2005 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often involved in hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with strong style influences.
Signature moves: Isamuashi Zan (Running Knee Strike), Diving Double Knee Drop.
Brief description: Isami Kodaka is renowned for his hardcore wrestling style. While primarily associated with other promotions, his appearances in DDT have showcased his versatility and willingness to engage in extreme matches.​

Hiroshi Fukuda
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2010 to 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in comedic roles.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with parodic elements.
Signature moves: F5, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Hiroshi Fukuda, known for his comedic persona, often parodied American wrestling stereotypes. His entertaining character work made him a memorable part of DDT's mid-card during his tenure.​

Hiroshi Yamato
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances as a freelancer.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Bomb, Moonsault Press.
Brief description: Hiroshi Yamato is a freelance wrestler known for his high-flying and technical prowess. He has made occasional appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, adding depth to the mid-card with his versatile in-ring style.​

Hiroyo Matsumoto
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Guest appearances in various events.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in women's matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical skills.
Signature moves: Rock Drop (Back-to-Belly Piledriver), Lariat.
Brief description: Hiroyo Matsumoto, a prominent figure in women's wrestling, has made guest appearances in DDT, showcasing her strength and versatility. Her involvement has added depth to the women's division in the promotion.​

Hisaya Imabayashi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2005 to present.
Position on the card: On-air authority figure, serving as the General Manager.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: Hisaya Imabayashi has been a prominent figure in DDT Pro-Wrestling's management, serving as the General Manager. He is responsible for match-making decisions and often appears in on-screen segments to enforce rules and maintain order during events.

Ivan Markov
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Notable appearances in 2013.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, competing for championships.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with a strong emphasis on striking and suplexes.
Signature moves: Lariat, German Suplex, Piledriver.
Brief description: Ivan Markov, known as the "Russian Bear," made a significant impact during his time in DDT Pro-Wrestling. In 2013, he became the inaugural Union Pro MAX Champion by defeating Shuji Ishikawa in a Hardcore Match at the event "Union Pro Shiwasu no Union." His tenure showcased his dominance and added an international flair to the promotion. ​

Joey Ryan
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in September 2015 with subsequent appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often featured in comedic segments.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with an emphasis on character-driven performances.
Signature moves: YouPorn Plex, Superkick.
Brief description: Joey Ryan made his Japanese debut for DDT Pro-Wrestling on September 19, 2015, defeating Tomomitsu Matsunaga. During this tour, he participated in a comedic spot where he used his groin to overpower Danshoku Dino, a moment that went viral and garnered international attention. This exposure led to features in outlets like the New York Daily News, Rolling Stone, and Vice, and secured him a sponsorship deal with YouPorn Sports. Ryan's unique blend of humor and wrestling skill made him a memorable figure in DDT.

Jun Akiyama
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Began appearing in 2020 and is currently active.
Position on the card: Main event, serving as a veteran presence and titleholder.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with strong style influences.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Wrist-clutch Exploder, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Jun Akiyama, a seasoned veteran renowned for his tenure in All Japan Pro Wrestling and Pro Wrestling NOAH, transitioned to DDT Pro-Wrestling in 2020. His arrival added significant prestige to the promotion. Akiyama captured the KO-D Openweight Championship in 2021, further solidifying his legacy. He also leads the stable "Burning," mentoring younger talent and contributing to DDT's dynamic roster.

The37Kamiina
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Formed in 2021 and currently active.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, frequently competing for championships.
Wrestling style: Diverse, incorporating high-flying, technical, and hardcore elements.
Signature moves: Varies among members; commonly includes high-impact aerial maneuvers and innovative double-team techniques.
Brief description: The37Kamiina, stylized as The37KAMIINA, is a prominent stable in DDT Pro-Wrestling comprising members Mao, Shunma Katsumata, Yuki Ueno, and Toi Kojima. The name "The37KAMIINA" is a play on words, with "37" pronounced as "san-na," sounding like "sauna," reflecting the group's lighthearted and energetic persona. Since their formation in 2021, they have been integral to DDT's tag team division, capturing the KO-D Tag Team Championship and engaging in notable feuds that highlight their versatility and chemistry.

Jun Kasai
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2002 to present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, primarily in hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Deathmatch wrestling with a high tolerance for pain.
Signature moves: Pearl Harbor Splash, Reverse Tiger Driver, various weapon-based attacks.
Brief description: Jun Kasai, known as the "Crazy Monkey," is a legendary figure in the deathmatch wrestling scene. His appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling have been characterized by brutal, hardcore bouts that push the limits of physical endurance. Kasai's fearless approach and willingness to endure extreme punishment have made him a cult favorite among fans.​

KAI
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances between 2011 and 2013.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, involved in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Meteor Impact (Fireman's carry into a sit-out powerbomb), Splash Plancha.
Brief description: KAI, a dynamic performer known for his strength and agility, made several notable appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling. His matches often showcased a blend of power moves and high-flying techniques, contributing to the promotion's diverse in-ring styles.​

Kana
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2010 to 2012.
Position on the card: Featured in special women's matches and intergender bouts.
Wrestling style: Striking-based offense with submission techniques.
Signature moves: Kana Lock (Crossface chickenwing), Roundhouse Kick.
Brief description: Kana, now globally recognized as Asuka in WWE, showcased her hard-hitting style during her time in DDT Pro-Wrestling. Her matches were noted for their intensity and technical proficiency, leaving a lasting impression on the audience.​

Kaori Yoneyama
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Occasional appearances from 2006 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in women's and intergender matches.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Yone-Zou (Diving senton), various roll-up variations.
Brief description: Kaori Yoneyama brought a unique blend of technical skill and humor to her DDT appearances. Her ability to engage the audience through both wrestling prowess and entertainment made her a versatile performer within the promotion.

Kazuki Hirata
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2008 and is currently active.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in comedic matches and dance segments.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with dance routines.
Signature moves: One-Shot Miracle (Superkick), Dance transitions into roll-ups.
Brief description: Kazuki Hirata is known for his entertaining dance routines and comedic timing. Often entering the ring with dance music and sunglasses, he adds a lighthearted element to DDT shows, engaging fans with his performances. 

Katsuhiko Nakajima
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made special appearances, notably in 2015.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, showcasing his striking ability.
Wrestling style: Strong style with emphasis on kicks and strikes.
Signature moves: Vertical Spike (Brainbuster), Various kick variations.
Brief description: Katsuhiko Nakajima, primarily associated with Pro Wrestling NOAH, made notable appearances in DDT, bringing his stiff striking style to the promotion and engaging in hard-hitting matches.​

KAZMA SAKAMOTO
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, including in 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Running Knee Strike, Powerbomb.
Brief description: KAZMA SAKAMOTO, known for his tenure in WWE, appeared in DDT showcasing his aggressive style and adding depth to the roster with his international experience.​

Katsumi Oribe
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active during the early 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, engaging in various match types.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with submission focus.
Signature moves: Various submission holds, Suplex variations.
Brief description: Katsumi Oribe contributed to DDT's mid-card scene with his technical prowess, participating in numerous matches that highlighted his grappling skills.​

Katsumi Usuda
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in the early 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often involved in shoot-style matches.
Wrestling style: Shoot-style wrestling with a focus on realistic strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Various submission holds, Striking combinations.
Brief description: Katsumi Usuda, known for his shoot-style background, brought a realistic and hard-hitting approach to his matches in DDT, appealing to fans of legitimate combat styles.​

Kazuki Hashimoto
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Participated in select events, including in 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card, showcasing his striking ability.
Wrestling style: Strong style with emphasis on kicks and strikes.
Signature moves: Diving Double Foot Stomp, Various kick variations.
Brief description: Kazuki Hashimoto, primarily associated with Big Japan Pro Wrestling, brought his intense striking style to DDT during his appearances, engaging in physical encounters.​

Kazusada Higuchi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2014 and is currently active.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often competing for championships.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with sumo influences.
Signature moves: Goten (Chokeslam), Various lariats.
Brief description: Kazusada Higuchi, with a background in sumo wrestling, has become a dominant force in DDT, known for his power moves and intensity, capturing multiple championships. ​
Wikipedia, la enciclopedia libre

KUDO
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2001 and is currently active.
Position on the card: Main event, recognized as a top performer.
Wrestling style: Kickboxing-based offense with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Diving Double Knee Drop, Various kick combinations.
Brief description: KUDO, blending kickboxing and pro wrestling, has been a cornerstone of DDT, known for his stiff kicks and aerial maneuvers, earning him multiple championships. ​

Kota Ibushi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2004 to 2016.
Position on the card: Main event, one of the promotion's top stars.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking-based offense.
Signature moves: Phoenix Splash, Kamigoye (Knee strike).
Brief description: Kota Ibushi gained fame in DDT for his incredible athleticism and innovative moves, becoming a fan favorite and elevating the promotion's profile.​

Konosuke Takeshita
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2012 and is currently active.
Position on the card: Main event, recognized as a top talent.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Zahi (Running knee strike), German Suplex.
Brief description: Konosuke Takeshita, a homegrown talent, has risen to prominence in DDT, known for his versatility and in-ring storytelling, capturing multiple championships. 

Kazusada Higuchi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2014 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Main event, recognized as a top performer.​
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with sumo influences.​
Signature moves: Goten (Chokeslam), Doctor Bomb, Canadian Back Breaker.​
Brief description: Kazusada Higuchi, a former sumo wrestler, transitioned to professional wrestling in 2014. His sumo background contributes to his powerful in-ring style. Higuchi has held multiple championships in DDT, including the KO-D Openweight Championship. 

Keigo Nakamura
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2019 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, often participating in tag team and multi-man matches.​
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.​
Signature moves: Swan Dive Missile Dropkick, Excellent (Second Rope Springboard Moonsault), Dropkick.​
Brief description: Keigo Nakamura is a young talent known for his agility and technical skills. Despite a knee injury in April 2023 that sidelined him for a year, he made a successful return to the ring in April 2024. Nakamura is a former KO-D 8-Man Tag Team Champion and currently holds the KO-D 10-Man Tag Team Championship. ​


Keisuke Ishii
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2008 and remained active until 2019.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, competing in singles and tag team matches.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with striking elements.​
Signature moves: Knee strikes, German Suplex.​
Brief description: Keisuke Ishii was known for his technical prowess and versatility in the ring. During his tenure in DDT, he captured the KO-D Tag Team Championship and was a prominent figure in the promotion's mid-card scene.​

Ken Ohka
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2002 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for his passionate persona.​
Wrestling style: Brawler with a resilient fighting spirit.​
Signature moves: Spear, Lariats.​
Brief description: Ken Ohka is celebrated for his fiery personality and determination. Beyond his in-ring career, he founded the Ganbare☆Pro-Wrestling promotion, a DDT subsidiary, where he continues to perform and mentor emerging talent.​

Kendo Kashin
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made special appearances, notably in 2019.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, bringing a unique blend of styles.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with martial arts influences.​
Signature moves: Cross Armbreaker, Kendo Clutch.​
Brief description: Kendo Kashin is renowned for his technical acumen and incorporation of martial arts into his wrestling style. His appearances in DDT added a distinctive flair to the promotion's events.​

Kengo Mashimo
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, primarily in the late 2000s.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for his stiff wrestling style.​
Wrestling style: Strong style with an emphasis on kicks and submissions.​
Signature moves: Vertical Spike (Brainbuster), various kick variations.​
Brief description: Kengo Mashimo's hard-hitting approach and technical skill made his matches in DDT memorable, contributing to the promotion's reputation for diverse wrestling styles.

Kenny Omega
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: 2008–2014, with a special appearance in 2019.​
Position on the card: Main event, recognized as a top performer.​
Wrestling style: A blend of high-flying maneuvers, technical prowess, and storytelling.​
Signature moves: One-Winged Angel (Electric chair driver), V-Trigger (Running knee strike), Snap Dragon Suplex.​
Brief description: Kenny Omega made a significant impact in DDT Pro-Wrestling, forming the acclaimed tag team "Golden☆Lovers" with Kota Ibushi. Their partnership led to multiple title reigns, including the KO-D Tag Team Championship. Omega's tenure in DDT showcased his versatility and charisma, contributing to his rise as a global wrestling star.

Kikutaro
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2004 to 2024.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily featured in comedic matches.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with a focus on entertaining antics.​
Signature moves: Knee strikes, various comedic spots.​
Brief description: Kikutaro is renowned for his comedic approach to wrestling, bringing humor and entertainment to his matches. His appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling have been well-received, adding a unique flavor to the promotion's diverse offerings. 

Konosuke Takeshita
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2012 and is currently active.
Position on the card: Main event, recognized as a top performer.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Zahi (Running knee strike), German Suplex.
Brief description: Konosuke Takeshita, a homegrown talent, has risen to prominence in DDT, known for his versatility and in-ring storytelling, capturing multiple championships. ​

Kota Ibushi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2004 to 2016.
Position on the card: Main event, one of the promotion's top stars.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking-based offense.
Signature moves: Phoenix Splash, Kamigoye (Knee strike).
Brief description: Kota Ibushi gained fame in DDT for his incredible athleticism and innovative moves, becoming a fan favorite and elevating the promotion's profile. ​

Kota Umeda
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2013 and retired in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for his striking ability.
Wrestling style: Kickboxing-influenced offense with technical grappling.
Signature moves: Roundhouse kicks, various knee strikes.
Brief description: Kota Umeda was recognized for blending martial arts striking with traditional wrestling, contributing to DDT's diverse in-ring styles. 

Kouki Iwasaki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2014 and was active until 2018.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in singles and tag team matches.​
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on strikes and submissions.​
Signature moves: Lariats, various suplexes.​
Brief description: Kouki Iwasaki showcased a hard-hitting style during his tenure in DDT, contributing to the promotion's dynamic mid-card scene before transitioning to other wrestling ventures.​

KUDO
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2001 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Main event, recognized as a top performer.​
Wrestling style: Kickboxing-based offense with high-flying elements.​
Signature moves: Diving Double Knee Drop, various kick combinations.​
Brief description: KUDO, blending kickboxing and pro wrestling, has been a cornerstone of DDT, known for his stiff kicks and aerial maneuvers, earning him multiple championships.​

Kuro-chan
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made special appearances, notably in 2019.​
Position on the card: Guest participant, primarily involved in comedic segments.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with entertaining antics.​
Signature moves: Various comedic spots.​
Brief description: Kuro-chan, a Japanese comedian, brought his unique humor to DDT events, participating in matches and segments that added a lighthearted element to the shows.​

Kuroshio TOKYO Japan
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in 2019.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, showcasing his flamboyant persona.​
Wrestling style: High-flying and charismatic performance.​
Signature moves: Moonsaults, various flashy maneuvers.​
Brief description: Kuroshio TOKYO Japan, also known as Ikemen Jiro, entertained DDT audiences with his charismatic style and high-energy performances during his appearances.​

Kyoko Kimura
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made sporadic appearances, primarily in the mid-2000s.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for her aggressive style.​
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with a brawler approach.​
Signature moves: Big boots, various weapon-based attacks.​
Brief description: Kyoko Kimura brought a fierce and unorthodox style to DDT, participating in matches that highlighted her hardcore wrestling tendencies.​

Ladybeard
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances between 2015 and 2016.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for comedic and entertainment segments.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with a focus on performance art.​
Signature moves: Various comedic spots and basic wrestling maneuvers.​
Brief description: Ladybeard, an Australian performer combining cross-dressing with heavy metal music, brought a unique entertainment style to DDT. His appearances added a distinctive flair to the promotion's diverse roster.​

LiLiCo
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2014 to 2017.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, often involved in mixed-gender and special attraction matches.​
Wrestling style: Celebrity guest wrestler with basic in-ring skills.​
Signature moves: Basic wrestling maneuvers.​
Brief description: LiLiCo, a Swedish-Japanese media personality, ventured into professional wrestling with DDT, participating in various storylines and matches that capitalized on her celebrity status.​

Lingerie Muto
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made sporadic appearances, notably in the early 2000s.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily featured in comedic matches.​
Wrestling style: Parody wrestling, emulating Keiji Mutoh's style with a comedic twist.​
Signature moves: Moonsault, Shining Wizard (performed humorously).​
Brief description: Lingerie Muto is a comedic character parodying Japanese wrestling legend Keiji Mutoh, performing in lingerie to add a humorous element to his matches.​

Mad Paulie
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2016 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, often aligned with the Damnation faction.​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with brawling techniques.​
Signature moves: Lariats, power slams.​
Brief description: Mad Paulie, characterized by his imposing presence and wild persona, has been a consistent member of the Damnation faction, contributing to its dominance in DDT.​

Madman Pondo
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in the early 2000s.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for hardcore and deathmatch wrestling.​
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with the use of weapons and violent spots.​
Signature moves: Stop sign attacks, various weapon-based maneuvers.​
Brief description: Madman Pondo, an American deathmatch wrestler, brought his hardcore style to DDT, participating in violent matches that catered to fans of extreme wrestling.​

Magnitude Kishiwada
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active intermittently from 2005 to 2015.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, recognized for his intensity and strength.​
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a blend of high-impact moves.​
Signature moves: Last Ride powerbomb, diving headbutt.​
Brief description: Magnitude Kishiwada, known for his intense persona and powerful offense, made significant impacts during his stints in DDT, including holding the KO-D Openweight Championship.

Maki Itoh
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2016 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for her charismatic persona and entertainment value.​
Wrestling style: A blend of idol performance and traditional wrestling, incorporating comedic elements.​
Signature moves: Itoh Special (Texas Cloverleaf), Flying Big Head (Diving Headbutt), Tornado DDT.​
Brief description: Maki Itoh transitioned from being a Japanese idol to professional wrestling, bringing a unique charisma to the ring. She gained attention for her outspoken personality and resilience, becoming a fan favorite in DDT and Tokyo Joshi Pro Wrestling. ​

MAO
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2015 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, recognized for his innovative in-ring style.​
Wrestling style: High-flying and high-risk maneuvers, often incorporating unconventional techniques.​
Signature moves: Cannonball 450° Splash, Tornado Whirlwind (Screw High Kick), Michinoku Driver II.​
Brief description: MAO is known for his creative and daring wrestling style, making him a standout performer in DDT. He has held multiple championships, including the KO-D Tag Team Championship and the DDT Universal Championship. ​

Makoto Oishi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2001 and has been active intermittently.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, often involved in tag team and comedic matches.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with comedic elements.​
Signature moves: Diving Headbutt, various submission holds.​
Brief description: Makoto Oishi is a seasoned wrestler known for his versatility and ability to adapt to various match styles, contributing significantly to DDT's entertainment value.​

Maku Donaruto
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in 2018.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily featured in comedic matches.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with exaggerated antics.​
Signature moves: Parody versions of popular wrestling moves.​
Brief description: Maku Donaruto is a comedic character known for his humorous take on wrestling, providing light-hearted entertainment during his appearances in DDT.​

Mammoth Sasaki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in the early 2000s.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, known for his hardcore wrestling style.​
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with power moves.​
Signature moves: Lariats, powerbombs.​
Brief description: Mammoth Sasaki brought a hardcore edge to DDT during his appearances, engaging in brutal matches that showcased his toughness and resilience.​

Mariko Yoshida
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made special appearances, notably in 2006.​
Position on the card: Guest performer, recognized for her technical prowess.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions.​
Signature moves: Air Raid Crash, various submission holds.​
Brief description: Mariko Yoshida is renowned for her technical wrestling skills, and her appearances in DDT added a level of sophistication and skill to the promotion's events.​

MARU
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2000 and has been active intermittently.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for his high-flying style.​
Wrestling style: Lucharesu, blending Japanese and Mexican wrestling techniques.​
Signature moves: Moonsaults, hurricanranas.​
Brief description: MARU's dynamic in-ring style has made him a notable figure in DDT, where he has showcased his agility and aerial skills.

Masa Takanashi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2003 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, recognized for his technical prowess and versatility.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and counter-wrestling.​
Signature moves: Takatonic (Modified Michinoku Driver II), various submission holds.​
Brief description: Masa Takanashi, trained by Último Dragón, has been a mainstay in DDT Pro-Wrestling since his debut. He has held multiple championships, including the KO-D Openweight Championship, KO-D Tag Team Championship, and DDT Extreme Championship. Takanashi is also known for his involvement in the stable Shuten-dōji, alongside Kudo and Yukio Sakaguchi, with whom he has won the KO-D 6-Man Tag Team Championship multiple times. ​

Masahiro Takanashi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active under this ring name since 2016.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, continuing his role as a technical wrestler.​
Wrestling style: Consistent with his previous persona, focusing on technical and submission-based wrestling.​
Signature moves: Takatonic, various submission holds.​
Brief description: In 2016, Masa Takanashi reverted to using his real name, Masahiro Takanashi, in his professional wrestling career. He has maintained his position as a skilled technical wrestler within DDT and continues to be an integral part of the promotion's roster. ​

Masao Inoue
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made special appearances, notably in 2013.​
Position on the card: Guest performer, often involved in comedic matches.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with traditional Japanese wrestling elements.​
Signature moves: Lariats, various pinning combinations.​
Brief description: Masao Inoue, primarily known for his work in All Japan Pro Wrestling and Pro Wrestling Noah, has made guest appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling. His involvement often adds a comedic flair to the events, aligning with DDT's entertainment-focused style.​

Masashi Takeda
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in the early 2010s.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for his hardcore wrestling style.​
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with a focus on deathmatch elements.​
Signature moves: Spear, various weapon-based attacks.​
Brief description: Masashi Takeda is renowned for his deathmatch wrestling style, primarily in promotions like Big Japan Pro Wrestling. His appearances in DDT brought a hardcore edge to the promotion's diverse match types.​

Masato Tanaka
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made special appearances, notably in 2013 and 2014.​
Position on the card: Guest performer, featured in high-profile matches.​
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting, strong style with high-impact moves.​
Signature moves: Roaring Elbow, Sliding D (sliding forearm smash).​
Brief description: Masato Tanaka, known for his tenure in ECW and Frontier Martial-Arts Wrestling (FMW), brought his hard-hitting style to DDT during his guest appearances, adding star power and experience to the events.​

Meiko Satomura
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, notably in 2020 and 2025.​
Position on the card: Featured performer, often in special attraction matches.​
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on strikes and technical prowess.​
Signature moves: Death Valley Bomb, Scorpion Rising (Scorpion Kick).​
Brief description: Meiko Satomura, a legendary figure in Japanese women's wrestling, has made notable appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling. In 2020, she participated in the "Saki Akai Okibariyasu Seven Match Series," defeating Saki Akai. In 2025, ahead of her scheduled retirement on April 29, she joined Sanshiro Takagi's 30th Anniversary Show, adding prestige to the event. Satomura is renowned for her contributions to women's wrestling, including co-founding Sendai Girls' Pro Wrestling. ​

MEN's Teioh
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active intermittently, with appearances as recent as 2022.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often involved in tag team matches.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with elements of comedy.​
Signature moves: Teioh Lock (Modified Figure-Four Leglock), various pinning combinations.​
Brief description: MEN's Teioh, known for his tenure in Big Japan Pro Wrestling and Michinoku Pro Wrestling, has made several appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling. His style blends technical skill with comedic elements, making him a versatile performer. In October 2022, he participated in a notable six-man tag team match alongside Makoto Oishi and Shiori Asahi against MAO, Shunma Katsumata, and Yuki Ueno. Teioh's experience and adaptability have made him a respected figure in the Japanese wrestling scene.​

Michael Nakazawa
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2005 and was active until 2019.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for his comedic wrestling style.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling, often incorporating unorthodox and humorous tactics.​
Signature moves: Ultimate Venom Arm (Mandible Claw variation), various oil-based maneuvers.​
Brief description: Michael Nakazawa is renowned for his comedic approach to wrestling, frequently using baby oil as part of his gimmick to slip out of holds. His unique style made him a memorable character in DDT Pro-Wrestling.​

MIKAMI
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 1998 and was active until 2014.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, recognized for his high-flying abilities.​
Wrestling style: High-flying and hardcore wrestling, often utilizing ladders in his matches.​
Signature moves: Swanton Bomb, various ladder-based maneuvers.​
Brief description: MIKAMI was a key figure in DDT's early years, known for his innovative use of ladders and aerial techniques. He contributed significantly to the promotion's hardcore and high-flying match styles.​

Mike Bailey
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances between 2016 and 2019.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, acclaimed for his striking and high-speed offense.​
Wrestling style: Hybrid of martial arts striking and high-flying maneuvers.​
Signature moves: Shooting Star Knee Drop, various kick combinations.​
Brief description: "Speedball" Mike Bailey brought a unique blend of martial arts and high-flying wrestling to DDT, earning recognition for his dynamic in-ring performances.​

Minoru Fujita
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active intermittently, with appearances as recent as 2022.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, often involved in tag team and hardcore matches.​
Wrestling style: Versatile, with experience in technical, high-flying, and hardcore wrestling.​
Signature moves: Fujita Driver II (Sitout Scoop Slam Piledriver), various deathmatch techniques.​
Brief description: Minoru Fujita is a seasoned wrestler known for his adaptability across various wrestling styles. His tenure in DDT includes participation in hardcore matches and collaborations with different factions.​

Minoru Suzuki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made special appearances, notably in 2017 and 2019.​
Position on the card: Guest performer, featured in high-profile matches.​
Wrestling style: Shoot-style wrestling with a focus on submissions and strikes.​
Signature moves: Gotch-Style Piledriver, various submission holds.​
Brief description: Minoru Suzuki, a legendary figure in Japanese wrestling and mixed martial arts, brought his hard-hitting style to DDT during his guest appearances, adding prestige and intensity to the promotion's events.​

Mio Shirai
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances between 2011 and 2015.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for her agility and technical skills.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with high-speed maneuvers.​
Signature moves: Tsukuyomi (Bridging Cross-Legged Boston Crab), various suplex variations.​
Brief description: Mio Shirai, sister of Io Shirai, showcased her wrestling prowess in DDT, participating in mixed-gender matches and bringing attention to women's wrestling within the promotion.​

Miss Mongol
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active intermittently, with appearances spanning from the early 2000s to the late 2010s.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in hardcore and comedic matches.​
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with a comedic twist.​
Signature moves: Various weapon-based attacks, comedic spots.​
Brief description: Miss Mongol is known for her bold persona and participation in hardcore matches, adding a unique flavor to DDT's diverse wrestling styles.

Miu Watanabe
Time in Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW): Debuted in 2018 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for her strength and energetic persona.​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with a focus on strength moves and agility.​
Signature moves: Giant Swing, Argentine Backbreaker, various lariats.​
Brief description: Miu Watanabe is a prominent figure in TJPW, recognized for her impressive strength and athleticism. As a member of the "Up Up Girls (Pro Wrestling)" idol group, she combines her performance background with wrestling, bringing a unique flair to her matches.​

Miyako Matsumoto
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances between 2009 and 2015.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for her comedic and unorthodox wrestling style.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with theatrical elements and audience interaction.​
Signature moves: Miyako Clutch (Roll-up variation), various dance-based maneuvers.​
Brief description: Miyako Matsumoto is known for blending comedy and performance art into her wrestling, often breaking the fourth wall and engaging the audience directly. Her unique approach has made her a memorable personality in the Japanese wrestling scene.​

Miyu Yamashita
Time in Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW): Debuted in 2013 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Main event, regarded as the "Ace" of TJPW.​
Wrestling style: Striking-based offense with martial arts influences.​
Signature moves: Crash Rabbit Heat (Running Knee Strike), Skull Kick, various roundhouse kicks.​
Brief description: Miyu Yamashita is a cornerstone of TJPW, known for her exceptional striking ability and in-ring charisma. As a multiple-time Princess of Princess Champion, she has been instrumental in elevating the profile of TJPW both domestically and internationally.​

Mizuki
Time in Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW): Debuted in 2016 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, celebrated for her high-flying and technical prowess.​
Wrestling style: High-flying maneuvers combined with technical wrestling.​
Signature moves: Cutie Special (Diving Stomp), Whirling Candy (Tilt-a-whirl Headscissors), various dropkicks.​
Brief description: Mizuki is renowned for her agility and innovative offense, making her one of TJPW's standout performers. As a two-time winner of the Tokyo Princess Cup, she has solidified her status as a top competitor in the promotion.​

Mizuki Watase
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2015 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for his resilience and fiery spirit.​
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on strikes and submissions.​
Signature moves: Watase Bottom (Uranage), various lariats, Boston Crab.​
Brief description: Mizuki Watase has steadily climbed the ranks in DDT, earning respect for his hard-hitting style and determination. His matches often showcase his fighting spirit and connection with the audience.​

MJ Paul
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2021 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, recognized for his imposing presence and alignment with the Damnation T.A. faction.​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with brawling techniques.​
Signature moves: Choke Slam, Powerbomb, various strikes.​
Brief description: MJ Paul brings a formidable presence to DDT, often acting as the enforcer within the Damnation T.A. faction. His strength and aggression make him a challenging opponent in the ring.​

Moonlight Express
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active as a tag team from 2018 to 2020.​
Members: MAO and Mike Bailey.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, known for their high-flying tandem offense.​
Wrestling style: Combination of high-flying and striking maneuvers.​
Signature moves: Ultima Weapon (Shooting Star Knee Drop), various double-team aerial attacks.​
Brief description: Moonlight Express captivated audiences with their seamless teamwork and exhilarating offense. They held the KO-D Tag Team Championship and were instrumental in showcasing DDT's tag team division on an international stage.

Nobuhiro Shimatani
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2016 and was active until 2021.​
Position on the card: Primarily undercard, often participating in multi-man tag matches.​
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical maneuvers.​
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Reverse Striker.​
Brief description: Nobuhiro Shimatani, also known as Check Shimatani, began his career in DDT Pro-Wrestling in 2016. Initially facing defeats to more experienced wrestlers, he gained experience and recognition over time. Shimatani was associated with the Damnation faction and later transitioned to freelancing, notably joining the BULK Orchestra stable in Gleat as of July 2022.

Nautilus
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active as a tag team from 2019 to 2020.​
Members: Naomi Yoshimura and Yuki Ueno.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, prominent in the tag team division.​
Wrestling style: Combination of power (Yoshimura) and agility (Ueno).​
Signature moves: Double-team maneuvers showcasing their contrasting styles.​
Brief description: Nautilus was a notable tag team in DDT Pro-Wrestling, capturing the KO-D Tag Team Championship. They engaged in significant feuds, including battles against the Eruption faction. Their matches were well-received, contributing to DDT's dynamic tag team scene. ​

NEO Biishiki-gun
Time in Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW): Active from 2017 to present.​
Members: Sakisama (leader), Martha, Azusa Christie, Yukio Saint Laurent, Mei Saint-Michel.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often involved in title feuds.​
Wrestling style: Elegant and aristocratic personas with technical wrestling.​
Signature moves: Varies by member; Sakisama is known for her striking and submission techniques.​
Brief description: NEO Biishiki-gun is a faction characterized by its aristocratic theme, led by the enigmatic Sakisama. The group has undergone various iterations, with members adopting personas that align with the faction's elegant and superior demeanor. They have been involved in prominent storylines and title matches within TJPW.

Nodoka Tenma
Time in Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW): Debuted on January 4, 2016, and retired on March 6, 2022. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, recognized for her tag team work.​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with a mix of comedic elements.​
Signature moves: Cross Body Attack, Backflip. 
Brief description: Nodoka Tenma, initially known as Nodoka-Oneesan, was a prominent figure in TJPW. She formed the tag team "BAKURETSU Sisters" with Yuki Aino, capturing the Princess Tag Team Championship. Her energetic performances and strong partnership with Aino made them fan favorites. ​

NOSAWA Rongai
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Participated as a founding member of DDT. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for his versatility and international experience.​
Wrestling style: Hybrid of Japanese strong style and lucha libre, reflecting his international training.​
Signature moves: Ultimate La Magistral. ​
Brief description: Kazushige Nosawa, better known as NOSAWA Rongai, is a Japanese professional wrestler renowned for his adaptability across various wrestling styles. A founding member of DDT Pro-Wrestling, he has also made significant contributions to promotions like All Japan Pro Wrestling and Pro Wrestling NOAH. NOSAWA co-founded the Tokyo Gurentai promotion and has been influential behind the scenes, serving as a producer for NOAH's "Monday Magic" shows. ​

Poison Sawada JULIE
Ring Names: Poison Sawada, Poison Sawada Black, Poison Sawada JULIE​
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 1999; retired in 2012; made a return in 2022.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, known for his unique character work and leadership in factions.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a blend of mystique and theatrical elements.​
Signature moves: Moai of Easter (Sitout inverted suplex slam), Asian mist, Bridging grounded double chickenwing (innovated), Chokeslam, Cobra clutch, Falcon arrow, Figure-four leglock, Guillotine choke, High knee, Mamushi Vice (Anaconda vice), Spinning heel kick, Yamato no Orochi (Inverted facelock takeover, sometimes while applying a sleeper hold).​
Brief description: Atsuo Sawada, better known by his ring name Poison Sawada JULIE, is a semi-retired Japanese professional wrestler renowned for his work in DDT Pro-Wrestling. Initially trained by New Japan Pro-Wrestling, Sawada gained prominence after debuting for DDT in 1999. Over his career, he became a two-time KO-D Openweight Champion and a seven-time Ironman Heavymetalweight Champion. He retired in November 2012 but made a notable return in March 2022 during DDT's 25th Anniversary event, where he teamed up with Akarangers (Gentaro and Takashi Sasaki) and Suicide Boyz (Mikami and Thanomsak Toba) to capture the KO-D 10-Man Tag Team Championship. ​


Pheromones
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2022 to 2023.​
Members: Danshoku "Dandy" Dieno, Yuki "Sexy" Iino, Yumehito "Fantastic" Imanari; later joined by Koju Takeda and 
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for their provocative and comedic performances.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with explicit and adult-themed antics.​
Signature moves: Various comedic and suggestive maneuvers that often involve audience interaction and physical comedy.​
Brief description: Pheromones was a controversial faction in DDT Pro-Wrestling, recognized for pushing the boundaries of comedic wrestling. Their performances often involved risqué humor and explicit content, leading to DDT's main YouTube channel facing demonetization due to sensitive content. This prompted the promotion to create a sub-channel to host Pheromones' matches and related videos. The faction disbanded in 2023, but their impact on DDT's comedic approach remains notable. ​

Pokotan
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2019 and is currently active.​
Position on the card: Undercard, primarily featured in comedic matches and segments.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with a focus on entertainment and audience engagement.​
Signature moves: Light-hearted and humorous maneuvers that align with the character's playful persona.​
Brief description: Pokotan is a mascot-like character in DDT Pro-Wrestling, embodying the promotion's penchant for blending wrestling with entertainment. The character participates in matches that are heavy on comedy, often engaging with both wrestlers and fans to elicit laughter and enjoyment.

Masa Takanashi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted on September 14, 2003, and has been a prominent figure in the promotion.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for his technical prowess and versatility.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and mat-based techniques.​
Signature moves: Various submission holds and technical maneuvers.​
Brief description: Masa Takanashi, trained by Último Dragón and the DDT dojo, has been a stalwart of DDT Pro-Wrestling since his debut. Over his career, he has held multiple championships, including the KO-D Openweight Championship, KO-D Tag Team Championship, KO-D 6-Man Tag Team Championship, DDT Extreme Championship, Ironman Heavymetalweight Championship, and the UWA World Trios Championship. Takanashi is also known for his work in the women's wrestling promotion Ice Ribbon, where he performed under the ring name Ribbon Takanashi, becoming a one-time International Ribbon Tag Team and Triangle Ribbon Champion. ​

Ricky Fuji
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Notably appeared at DDT's Ryōgoku Peter Pan 2011 event. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card, recognized for his charisma and experience.​
Wrestling style: Showman style with a blend of technical and high-flying maneuvers.​
Signature moves: 9999 (a diving headbutt).​
Brief description: Ricky Fuji is a seasoned Japanese professional wrestler who gained prominence in the 1990s. Trained by the New Japan Dojo and Stu Hart, he has competed in various Japanese promotions. In DDT, he teamed with The Great Sasuke at Ryōgoku Peter Pan 2011 but was defeated by the team of Munenori Sawa and Sanshiro Takagi. ​

Riho
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in 2010 and 2019. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for her agility and technical prowess.​
Wrestling style: High-speed, technical wrestling with a focus on agility.​
Signature moves: Somato (running double knee strike), various roll-up variations.​
Brief description: Riho is a Japanese professional wrestler who began her career at the age of 9 under the training of Emi Sakura. She has competed in various promotions, including Ice Ribbon, Gatoh Move Pro Wrestling, and DDT Pro-Wrestling. In DDT, she notably teamed with Kenny Omega and Mr. #6 to win the Sea Of Japan 6-Person Tag Team Championship in 2010. Riho gained international recognition by joining All Elite Wrestling (AEW) in 2019, becoming the inaugural AEW Women's World Champion.

Saki Akai
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted on August 18, 2013; retired on November 12, 2023. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for her versatility and charisma.​
Wrestling style: Combines technical prowess with striking ability, reflecting her modeling background.​
Signature moves: Various kicks and submission holds.​
Brief description: Saki Akai is a Japanese professional wrestler, model, and actress. She began her wrestling career with DDT Pro-Wrestling in 2013 and quickly became a prominent figure in the promotion. Throughout her career, Akai held the Ironman Heavymetalweight Championship multiple times and was a member of the Eruption stable alongside Yukio Sakaguchi and Kazusada Higuchi. She also competed in Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW), where she won the Princess Tag Team Championship three times under the persona of Sakisama. Akai officially retired from in-ring competition on November 12, 2023, at DDT's Ultimate Party event, where she was honored by her peers and offered a staff position within DDT, which she accepted. ​

Sakisama
Time in Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW): Debuted as Sakisama in 2011. ​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often leading factions and engaging in title feuds.​
Wrestling style: Elegant and aristocratic persona with a technical wrestling approach.​
Signature moves: Various submission holds and striking techniques.​
Brief description: Sakisama is the alter ego of Saki Akai, portrayed as an aristocratic and domineering figure in TJPW. She leads the faction NEO Biishiki-gun, which has included members like Azusa Christie and Mei Saint-Michel. Under this persona, Sakisama has captured the Princess Tag Team Championship three times, showcasing a blend of elegance and in-ring prowess. The character debuted in 2011, with the "Sakisama" moniker being adopted in 2013 to enhance the aristocratic gimmick. 

Sanshiro Takagi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Founder of DDT in 1997; has served as president and active wrestler since then. ​
Position on the card: Main eventer, prominent both in-ring and in management.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with innovative and unorthodox match concepts.​
Signature moves: Stunners, weapon-based offense, and comedic spots.​
Brief description: Sanshiro Takagi is a pivotal figure in Japanese professional wrestling, having founded DDT Pro-Wrestling in 1997. Under his leadership, DDT became renowned for its unique blend of comedy and wrestling, often parodying mainstream promotions. Takagi's in-ring persona is characterized by humor and creativity, contributing to DDT's distinct identity. In 2024, he announced a hiatus from in-ring competition due to health concerns, specifically heart issues that had previously required surgery in 2020. ​

Saori Anou
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made sporadic appearances between 2017 and 2020. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in various matches and events.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with agility and striking techniques.​
Signature moves: Fisherman's suplex.​
Brief description: Saori Anou is a Japanese professional wrestler who debuted in 2015. She has competed across multiple promotions, including DDT Pro-Wrestling, where she participated in events like DDT YAROZ Part 4 in 2017 and DDT Live! Maji Manji #11 in 2018. Anou is also known for her tenure in Actwres girl'Z, where she became the inaugural AgZ Champion in 2018. In March 2024, she signed an exclusive one-year contract with World Wonder Ring Stardom, further elevating her profile in the Japanese wrestling scene. ​

Schadenfreude International
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active as of November 2024.​
Members: Chris Brookes and Takeshi Masada.​
Position on the card: Tag team competitors.​
Wrestling style: Combination of technical prowess and high-impact maneuvers.​
Signature moves: Various tag team combinations.​
Brief description: Schadenfreude International is a tag team comprising Chris Brookes and Takeshi Masada. They captured the KO-D Tag Team Championship on November 4, 2024, at the Sumida Dramatic Dream event in Tokyo.​

Shigehiro Irie
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted on April 30, 2008; active until 2018. ​
Position on the card: Main eventer, known for his strength and agility.​
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with high-impact moves.​
Signature moves: Beast Bomber (lariat), Cannonball Senton.​
Brief description: Shigehiro Irie is a Japanese professional wrestler renowned for his tenure in DDT Pro-Wrestling. He captured the KO-D Openweight Championship three times and was a key member of Team Dream Futures alongside Keisuke Ishii and Soma Takao. Irie also held the KO-D Tag Team Championship and the KO-D 6-Man Tag Team Championship multiple times. In 2018, he announced his departure from DDT to pursue opportunities as a freelancer, competing internationally in promotions such as All Japan Pro Wrestling and Westside Xtreme Wrestling, where he won the wXw Unified World Wrestling Championship in 2023. ​

Shinya Aoki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2018; active as of 2024. ​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, leveraging his MMA background.​
Wrestling style: Submission-based offense, incorporating judo and Brazilian jiu-jitsu techniques.​
Signature moves: Various submission holds, including the Triangle Choke and Cross Armbreaker.​
Brief description: Shinya Aoki is a distinguished mixed martial artist and professional wrestler, recognized for his grappling expertise. Transitioning to professional wrestling in 2014, he joined DDT Pro-Wrestling in 2018, where he became a three-time DDT Extreme Champion and held the Ironman Heavymetalweight Championship. In August 2024, Aoki captured the KO-D Openweight Championship, successfully defending it against notable challengers such as Yuki Ueno and Tetsuya Endo. His unique blend of legitimate combat skills and wrestling acumen has made him a prominent figure in DDT. ​

Shiro Koshinaka
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Has made guest appearances, including a match on April 23, 2023. ​
Position on the card: Special guest, often featured in multi-man tag matches.​
Wrestling style: Traditional Japanese strong style with an emphasis on strikes and suplexes.​
Signature moves: Hip attack, powerbomb.​
Brief description: Shiro Koshinaka is a veteran Japanese professional wrestler renowned for his tenure in promotions like New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW) and All Japan Pro Wrestling (AJPW). He was the inaugural IWGP Junior Heavyweight Champion and a founding member of the Heisei Ishingun stable. In DDT Pro-Wrestling, Koshinaka has participated as a special guest, bringing his experience and charisma to the promotion's events. ​

Shuji Ishikawa
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2003; active as of January 2025. ​
Position on the card: Main eventer, recognized for his dominance and versatility.​
Wrestling style: Combines power moves with technical wrestling, often utilizing his size advantage.​
Signature moves: Splash Mountain (powerbomb variation), running knee lift.​
Brief description: Shuji Ishikawa is a prominent figure in Japanese professional wrestling, known for his work across multiple promotions, including DDT Pro-Wrestling, Big Japan Pro Wrestling (BJW), and All Japan Pro Wrestling (AJPW). In DDT, he has secured the KO-D Openweight Championship four times and won the King of DDT Tournament in 2016. Ishikawa's career also boasts accolades such as the BJW Deathmatch Heavyweight Championship and the AJPW Triple Crown Heavyweight Championship. As of January 2025, he continues to compete at a high level, recently earning a shot at the KO-D Openweight Championship. ​

Shunma Katsumata
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted on April 29, 2014; active as of March 2025. ​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for his high-energy performances and versatility.​
Wrestling style: High-flying and hardcore wrestling, often incorporating innovative spots.​
Signature moves: Diving splash, superkick, various deathmatch techniques.​
Brief description: Shunma Katsumata is a Japanese professional wrestler renowned for his dynamic in-ring style. He has been a prominent figure in DDT Pro-Wrestling, where he has held multiple championships, including the DDT Extreme Championship. Katsumata is also a member of the DDT Sauna Club stable, alongside Mao and others. In March 2025, he participated in DDT's 28th Anniversary Show, teaming with Kazusada Higuchi in a match for the KO-D 6-Man Tag Team Championship. ​

Soma Takao
Real Name: Soma Takao​
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2007; active as of March 2025.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for his technical prowess and adaptability.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and striking.​
Signature moves: Gin and Tonic (sit-out double underhook powerbomb), various submission holds.​
Brief description: Soma Takao is a seasoned Japanese professional wrestler affiliated with DDT Pro-Wrestling. Throughout his career, he has been part of several notable factions, including Smile Squash and Damnation. In October 2024, Takao competed in an eight-man tag team match at DDT's "God Bless DDT 2024" event, showcasing his enduring presence in the promotion. As of March 2025, he continues to be an active competitor, participating in various events and matches.​

Shuten-dōji
Members: Kota Umeda, Masahiro Takanashi, Yukio Sakaguchi, and Kudo.​
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Formed in 2013; active until 2019.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, known for their cohesive teamwork and strong presence.​
Wrestling style: A blend of striking, technical wrestling, and martial arts influences.​
Signature moves: Various tag team combinations and synchronized strikes.​
Brief description: Shuten-dōji was a prominent stable in DDT Pro-Wrestling, characterized by its members' martial arts backgrounds and hard-hitting style. The group captured the KO-D 6-Man Tag Team Championship multiple times and was involved in significant storylines throughout its tenure. Their influence extended beyond in-ring competition, contributing to DDT's unique blend of wrestling and entertainment.​

Smile Squash
Members: Harashima, Akito, and later joined by Soma Takao.​
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Formed in 2013; active until 2017.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, known for their technical skills and fan-friendly personas.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with an emphasis on sportsmanship and high-energy performances.​
Signature moves: Various tag team maneuvers and individual finishers.​
Brief description: Smile Squash was a faction in DDT Pro-Wrestling that embodied the promotion's spirit of innovation and entertainment. Led by Harashima, the group achieved success in both singles and tag team competition, capturing multiple championships. Their matches were characterized by a blend of athleticism and storytelling, making them favorites among fans.​

Smile Yankees
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Formed in 2016; active until 2017.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, known for their chemistry and dynamic tag team style.​
Wrestling style: A combination of high-flying and hardcore wrestling elements.​
Signature moves: Double-team maneuvers and utilization of weapons in hardcore matches.​
Brief description: Smile Yankees was a tag team that brought together two of DDT's most respected wrestlers. Their partnership led to capturing the KO-D Tag Team Championship, and they were known for their exciting matches that often incorporated hardcore elements. Their run added depth to DDT's tag team division during their active years.

Super Sasadango Machine
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2008; active as of March 2025.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for his comedic persona and creative match presentations.​
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling with technical elements.​
Signature moves: Sasadango Machine Suplex, PowerPoint presentations before matches.​
Brief description: Super Sasadango Machine is a comedic character portrayed by Masahiro Takanashi in DDT Pro-Wrestling. He is renowned for delivering PowerPoint presentations before his matches, adding a unique entertainment aspect to his performances. As of March 2025, he holds the DDT Extreme Championship, having won it at the "Judgement - 28th Anniversary" event on March 20, 2025. ​

Survival Tobita
Real Name: Kazuhiko Tobita​
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in the early 2000s; currently inactive.​
Position on the card: Mid-card, known for his hardcore wrestling style and unique character.​
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling with deathmatch elements.​
Signature moves: Various weapon-based attacks, brawling techniques.​
Brief description: Survival Tobita is a Japanese professional wrestler known for his hardcore wrestling style and participation in deathmatches. He gained notoriety in the Japanese independent wrestling scene during the early 2000s. His character often portrayed a rugged survivor, engaging in brutal and violent matches. While not a regular in DDT Pro-Wrestling, he made notable appearances that contributed to his cult following among hardcore wrestling fans.​

STRONGHEARTS
Members: Cima, T-Hawk, El Lindaman, and others.​
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in 2019 and 2020.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, known for their high-energy performances and strong team cohesion.​
Wrestling style: A blend of high-flying and strong style wrestling.​
Signature moves: Various tag team combinations and high-impact maneuvers.​
Brief description: STRONGHEARTS is a faction led by Cima, consisting of former Dragon Gate wrestlers who have made appearances in various promotions, including DDT Pro-Wrestling. They are known for their dynamic wrestling style, combining aerial techniques with hard-hitting strikes. Their presence in DDT brought fresh matchups and added excitement to the promotion's events during their appearances.

SUSUMU (Susumu Yokosuka)
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Limited appearances; primarily associated with Dragon Gate.​
Position on the card: Guest performer, known for his technical prowess.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and strikes.​
Signature moves: Jumbo no Kachi! (lariat), Mugen (half nelson suplex).​
Brief description: Susumu Yokosuka, also known as Susumu Mochizuki, is a seasoned Japanese professional wrestler best recognized for his extensive tenure with Dragon Gate. While his appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling have been sporadic, his technical skill and in-ring psychology have made him a respected figure in the Japanese wrestling scene. Throughout his career, Yokosuka has held multiple championships, showcasing his adaptability and enduring appeal.​

T-Hawk
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made notable appearances between 2018 and 2020.​
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, especially when aligned with #StrongHearts.​
Wrestling style: A blend of strong style and high-flying maneuvers.​
Signature moves: Night Ride (fireman's carry into a tombstone piledriver), various striking combinations.​
Brief description: T-Hawk is a prominent Japanese professional wrestler known for his dynamic in-ring style and leadership within the #StrongHearts faction. After a successful tenure with Dragon Gate, he expanded his horizons by competing in various promotions, including DDT Pro-Wrestling. His alliance with #StrongHearts brought fresh matchups and excitement to DDT's events, solidifying his reputation as a versatile and compelling performer.​

TAKA Michinoku
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Occasional appearances; primarily associated with Kaientai Dojo and New Japan Pro-Wrestling.​
Position on the card: Guest performer, bringing veteran experience.​
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling, pioneering the junior heavyweight style.​
Signature moves: Michinoku Driver II (sitout scoop slam piledriver), Just Facelock (modified crossface).​
Brief description: TAKA Michinoku is a trailblazer in Japanese professional wrestling, renowned for his contributions to the junior heavyweight division. As the founder of Kaientai Dojo, he has mentored numerous wrestlers while maintaining an active in-ring career. His sporadic appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling have been well-received, adding a layer of prestige and experience to the promotion's events.​

Takashi Sasaki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Early career involvement; later focused on Freedoms promotion.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for hardcore wrestling.​
Wrestling style: Hardcore and deathmatch wrestling, utilizing weapons and high-risk spots.​
Signature moves: D-Geist (modified DDT), various weapon-based attacks.​
Brief description: Takashi Sasaki is a Japanese professional wrestler recognized for his hardcore wrestling style. After starting his career in promotions like DDT, he established Pro Wrestling Freedoms, focusing on deathmatch wrestling. His contributions have been pivotal in popularizing hardcore wrestling in Japan, and his early work with DDT showcased his versatility and passion for the craft.​

Takeshi Masada
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted on August 14, 2022; active as of March 2025. ​
Position on the card: Rising star, known for his rapid progression and technical prowess.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with striking elements, influenced by his Shorinji Kempo background.​
Signature moves: Triangular Kick. ​
Brief description: Takeshi Masada is a promising Japanese professional wrestler who made his debut in DDT Pro-Wrestling in August 2022, just three months after joining the promotion—a record-setting pace. Prior to wrestling, he achieved third place in the Inter-High School Championships in Shorinji Kempo. Since his debut, Masada has competed in various tournaments, including winning the inaugural D Generations Cup in 2023, earning him a spot on DDT's Hollywood tour. He is also a former two-time Ironman Heavymetalweight Champion. 

Tatsumi Fujinami
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Occasional appearances, notably in 2018 and 2019. ​
Position on the card: Guest legend, bringing decades of experience and prestige.​
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling, known for innovating moves like the Dragon Sleeper and Dragon Suplex.​
Signature moves: Dragon Sleeper, Dragon Suplex.​
Brief description: Tatsumi Fujinami, nicknamed "The Dragon," is a legendary figure in professional wrestling, best known for his tenure with New Japan Pro-Wrestling (NJPW), where he was a six-time IWGP Heavyweight Champion. He is credited with inventing the Dragon Sleeper and Dragon Suplex. Fujinami has made occasional appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, adding prestige to the events he participates in. 

Takuya Nomura
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in 2023 and 2025.​
Position on the card: Guest performer, known for his hard-hitting style.​
Wrestling style: Strong style, emphasizing stiff strikes and submissions.​
Signature moves: Various stiff kicks and submission holds.​
Brief description: Takuya Nomura is a Japanese professional wrestler primarily associated with Big Japan Pro Wrestling (BJW). He has made notable appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, showcasing his strong style wrestling. In March 2023, he teamed with Masato Tanaka and Takeshi Masada in the Toshiwasure! Shuffle 6-Man Tag Team Tournament, co-promoted with BJW. In March 2025, Nomura, alongside Fuminori Abe as the Astronauts, captured the KO-D Tag Team Championship at DDT's Judgement 2025 event. ​

Takashi Sasaki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Early career involvement; later focused on Freedoms promotion.​
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, known for hardcore wrestling.​
Wrestling style: Hardcore and deathmatch wrestling, utilizing weapons and high-risk spots.​
Signature moves: D-Geist (modified DDT), various weapon-based attacks.​
Brief description: Takashi Sasaki is a Japanese professional wrestler recognized for his hardcore wrestling style. After starting his career in promotions like DDT, he established Pro Wrestling Freedoms, focusing on deathmatch wrestling. His contributions have been pivotal in popularizing hardcore wrestling in Japan, and his early work with DDT showcased his versatility and passion for the craft.

Team Dream Futures
Active Years: 2012–2016​
Promotions: DDT Pro-Wrestling, All Japan Pro Wrestling (AJPW)​
Brief Description: Team Dream Futures was a stable in DDT Pro-Wrestling formed in 2012, comprising Keisuke Ishii, Soma Takao, and Shigehiro Irie. The group was known for their cohesive teamwork and competitive spirit. They also made appearances in AJPW, showcasing their versatility across promotions. The stable disbanded on May 29, 2016. ​

Tetsuya Endo
Wrestling Style: High-flying and technical wrestling, utilizing agility and aerial maneuvers.​
Signature Moves: Burning Star Press, Tetsuya in the Sky with Diamonds, Torture Rack Bomb​

Toru Owashi
Time in DDT Pro Wrestling: Debuted in 2002; active regularly through the 2010s and into 2025.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often involved in tag matches and comedic storylines.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Running Nodo-wa Drop, Diving Body Press.
Brief description: Toru Owashi is a former sumo wrestler turned DDT veteran. Known for balancing brute strength with comedic timing, he has held the KO-D Openweight, Tag, and 6-Man Tag Team Championships. Owashi also became a multi-time Ironman Heavymetalweight Champion and currently holds the O-40 Championship as of late 2024. His long-standing presence and versatility have made him a key figure in DDT's ensemble cast.

Tomomitsu Matsunaga
Time in DDT Pro Wrestling: Active since the early 2000s; regular appearances continuing into 2025.
Position on the card: Undercard to mid-card, often featured in multi-man tag matches and comedy segments.
Wrestling style: Adaptive hybrid of comedy and basic technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Elbow strikes, schoolboy pins, variations based on storyline context.
Brief description: Tomomitsu Matsunaga has been a consistent and loyal performer within DDT Pro Wrestling, known for his role in comedic and ensemble matches. He has captured the Ironman Heavymetalweight Championship multiple times and regularly participates in events at Korakuen Hall and other major DDT shows. His enduring presence has helped maintain the humorous backbone of DDT's unique style.

Trans-Am★Hiroshi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2013 to present, with regular appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer, often involved in comedic and character-driven matches.
Wrestling style: Blend of comedy and traditional wrestling, emphasizing character work.
Signature moves: Perfect Plex.
Brief description: Trans-Am★Hiroshi, born Hiroshi Fukuda, is known for his unique persona and entertaining performances in DDT Pro-Wrestling. He has also competed in Kaientai Dojo and held the Union Non-Certified US Heavyweight Championship, a title exclusive to him throughout its history. ​

Tsutomu Oosugi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances, primarily in tag team matches.
Position on the card: Tag team specialist, often featured in high-flying bouts.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Springboard DDT (Tsuki no Ishi), One-handed cartwheel arm wrench transitioned into crucifix pin (Fairy Ointment).
Brief description: Tsutomu Oosugi is a freelancer active in the Japanese independent circuit, regularly competing in Michinoku Pro Wrestling and Big Japan Pro Wrestling. He has made notable appearances in DDT Pro-Wrestling, often teaming with Banana Senga as the "Speed of Sounds." Oosugi is recognized for his agility and innovative maneuvers. 

Unagi Sayaka
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: 2019–2020, with sporadic appearances in 2022 and 2024.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer, often involved in tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Versatile, blending traditional wrestling techniques with high-energy maneuvers.
Signature moves: Notably held the Ironman Heavymetalweight Championship.
Brief description: Unagi Sayaka, also known as Himawari Unagi, began her wrestling career with Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW) in 2019. During her tenure with TJPW, she also appeared for DDT Pro-Wrestling, notably at Wrestle Peter Pan 2019, where she teamed up with Natsumi Maki and Yuna Manase in a losing effort against Rika Tatsumi and The Bakuretsu Sisters (Nodoka Tenma and Yuki Aino). In 2022, she made a return to DDT, participating in matches such as the DDT Osaka vs. Tokyo event on August 10, 2024, where she teamed with Momoka Hanazono to defeat Riara and Yoshiko Hasegawa.

World's Cutest Tag Team
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Notably appeared in 2016.
Position on the card: Featured tag team, engaging in intergender matches.
Wrestling style: Intergender tag team wrestling with a mix of comedy and traditional techniques.
Signature moves: Notably held the PWG World Tag Team Championship.
Brief description: The World's Cutest Tag Team, consisting of Candice LeRae and Joey Ryan, gained prominence in various independent promotions, including Pro Wrestling Guerrilla (PWG), where they held the PWG World Tag Team Championship. Their involvement with DDT Pro-Wrestling included appearances in 2016, where they showcased their unique intergender tag team dynamic.

Yasu Urano
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: 2007–2017, with regular appearances; occasional returns as a freelancer post-2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer, often involved in tag team and six-man tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and mat-based techniques.
Signature moves: Tombstone Piledriver, Avalanche Frankensteiner, High Angle Missile Dropkick, Yasu Clutch (Modified Kido Clutch).
Brief description: Yasu Urano is a Japanese professional wrestler known for his tenure with DDT Pro-Wrestling. After freelancing early in his career, he signed with DDT in 2007, becoming a mainstay in the promotion. Urano achieved success as a two-time KO-D Tag Team Champion, partnering with KUDO and later with Yuji Hino. He also held the Ironman Heavymetalweight Championship. In April 2017, Urano announced his departure from DDT to pursue a freelance career, seeking new challenges and opportunities. Despite his departure, he has made sporadic returns to DDT events, including participating in the "Smile Squash" team alongside HARASHIMA and Akito. ​

Yoshihiko
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2004; ongoing appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction; involved in comedic and novelty matches.
Wrestling style: Parody of various wrestling styles, depending on the scenario.
Signature moves: Varies; often mimics moves of famous wrestlers.
Brief description: Yoshihiko is a unique character in DDT Pro-Wrestling, portrayed by a series of inflatable or stuffed dolls. Despite being an inanimate object, Yoshihiko is treated as a legitimate competitor within DDT's storylines, with opponents selling its "offense" as if performed by a human wrestler. This character has held multiple championships, including the Ironman Heavymetalweight Championship, and has been involved in various high-profile matches, often adding a comedic and surreal element to DDT events. ​

Yoshiaki Yatsu
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Special guest; featured in exhibition and nostalgia matches.
Wrestling style: Traditional Japanese strong style with a focus on grappling and strikes.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Lariat.
Brief description: Yoshiaki Yatsu is a renowned Japanese professional wrestler and former amateur wrestler. While not a regular competitor in DDT Pro-Wrestling, he has made special appearances, bringing his legacy and experience to the promotion. Yatsu's involvement in DDT events serves as a bridge between traditional Japanese wrestling and DDT's contemporary style.

Yuka Sakazaki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Regular appearances since 2013 through Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW), a DDT affiliate.
Position on the card: Main event performer in TJPW; occasional appearances in DDT events.
Wrestling style: High-flying and energetic, incorporating agility and aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Magical Girl Splash (450° splash), Magical Merry-Go-Round (spinning back elbow).
Brief description: Yuka Sakazaki, known as the "Magical Girl," debuted in 2013 with TJPW. She quickly rose to prominence, capturing the Princess of Princess Championship multiple times. Her charismatic persona and in-ring prowess have made her a standout talent, leading to international appearances, including All Elite Wrestling (AEW). Sakazaki's involvement in DDT events often highlights inter-promotional showcases, emphasizing her versatility and appeal across different audiences.​

Yuki Aino
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active since 2017 through TJPW; occasional appearances in DDT events.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in TJPW; featured in tag team and singles competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with a focus on strength and resilience.
Signature moves: Side Suplex, Aino Zack Driver (modified Michinoku Driver).
Brief description: Yuki Aino debuted in TJPW in 2017 and has established herself as a formidable competitor, particularly in the tag team division alongside her sister, Nodoka Tenma, as the Bakuretsu Sisters. The duo has captured the Princess Tag Team Championship, showcasing their synergy and dominance. Aino's appearances in DDT events are typically in collaborative showcases, reflecting the strong relationship between DDT and TJPW.​

Yuki Iino
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2017; active member of the roster.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, involved in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with explosive strength and intensity.
Signature moves: Spear, Haka Elbow (running elbow strike).
Brief description: Yuki Iino, a former rugby player, transitioned to professional wrestling with DDT in 2017. His athletic background contributes to his powerful in-ring style. Iino is a member of the ALL OUT faction and has competed for various championships, including the KO-D Openweight Title. His charisma and physicality have made him a prominent figure in DDT's evolving landscape.​

Yuki Kamifuku
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active since 2017 through TJPW; occasional appearances in DDT events.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer in TJPW; known for her character work and charisma.
Wrestling style: Striker with an emphasis on kicks and character-driven antics.
Signature moves: Famouser (leg drop bulldog), Kamifuku Roller (rolling neckbreaker).
Brief description: Yuki Kamifuku entered the wrestling scene with TJPW in 2017, bringing a unique blend of modeling experience and athleticism. She captured the International Princess Championship, highlighting her growth and popularity within the promotion. Kamifuku's appearances in DDT events are part of the collaborative efforts between DDT and TJPW, allowing her to showcase her talents to a broader audience.​

Yoshihiko
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2004; ongoing appearances.
Position on the card: Special attraction; involved in comedic and novelty matches.
Wrestling style: Parody of various wrestling styles, depending on the scenario.
Signature moves: Varies; often mimics moves of famous wrestlers.
Brief description: Yoshihiko is a unique character in DDT Pro-Wrestling, portrayed by a series of inflatable or stuffed dolls. Despite being an inanimate object, Yoshihiko is treated as a legitimate competitor within DDT's storylines, with opponents selling its "offense" as if performed by a human wrestler. This character has held multiple championships, including the Ironman Heavymetalweight Championship, and has been involved in various high-profile matches, often adding a comedic and surreal element to DDT events.

Yuki Ueno
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2016; active member of the roster.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event performer, involved in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, showcasing agility and precision.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, German Suplex Hold.
Brief description: Yuki Ueno is a prominent figure in DDT Pro-Wrestling, known for his dynamic in-ring style and resilience. He has been part of notable factions such as "The 37KAMIINA" alongside Konosuke Takeshita, MAO, and Shunma Katsumata. Ueno has held the KO-D Openweight Championship and the KO-D Tag Team Championship, reflecting his versatility and prominence within the promotion. In October 2023, Ueno was sidelined due to the flu, leading to his absence from scheduled events. ​

Yukio Sakaguchi
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2012; active member of the roster.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event performer, frequently featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Shoot-style wrestling, incorporating martial arts strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Penalty Kick, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Yukio Sakaguchi, son of legendary wrestler Seiji Sakaguchi, transitioned from mixed martial arts to professional wrestling with DDT. His legitimate combat background adds authenticity to his wrestling style. Sakaguchi has been a key member of the "Eruption" stable alongside Saki Akai and Kazusada Higuchi. He has captured multiple championships, including the KO-D Openweight Title and the KO-D Tag Team Titles. Sakaguchi's matches are characterized by stiff strikes and a no-nonsense approach, making him a respected figure in the promotion. ​
Online World of Wrestling

Yuko Miyamoto
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Sporadic appearances since the mid-2000s.
Position on the card: Featured in hardcore and deathmatch-style bouts.
Wrestling style: Hardcore wrestling, utilizing weapons and high-risk maneuvers.
Signature moves: Moonsault Press, Fire Thunder Driver.
Brief description: Yuko Miyamoto is renowned for his contributions to the deathmatch wrestling scene in Japan, particularly with Big Japan Pro Wrestling (BJW). In DDT, he has participated in various hardcore matches, bringing his expertise in extreme wrestling environments. Miyamoto's ability to endure pain and deliver high-impact moves has earned him a distinct reputation among hardcore wrestling enthusiasts. ​

Yuki Miyazaki
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Participated in matches during the early 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer, often involved in tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Joshi puroresu, blending technical prowess with aerial techniques.
Signature moves: Diving Senton, German Suplex.
Brief description: Yuki Miyazaki is a seasoned joshi wrestler who has competed across various Japanese promotions. Trained by Plum Mariko and Jaguar Yokota, she debuted in 1995 and has showcased her talents in organizations like JWP, Osaka Pro Wrestling, and Pro Wrestling WAVE. Her tenure in DDT included participation in intergender and comedy matches, reflecting DDT's eclectic style. ​

Yumi Ohka
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Made appearances in the early 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag team bouts.
Wrestling style: Joshi puroresu, emphasizing strikes and technical skills.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Yumi Ohka, born Yumiko Abe, is a prominent figure in the joshi wrestling scene. Originally trained by JDStar, she has competed in various promotions, including Oz Academy and Pro Wrestling WAVE, where she also serves in a managerial capacity. Ohka's appearances in DDT highlighted her adaptability and experience, contributing to inter-promotional events and matches. ​

Yuna Manase
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2017 to 2020 through Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW), a DDT affiliate.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer, engaging in singles and tag team competitions.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense with charismatic showmanship.
Signature moves: Lariat, Running Senton.
Brief description: Yuna Manase began her career with TJPW, where she quickly became a fan favorite due to her energetic persona and in-ring charisma. She has been involved in various storylines and matches that emphasize her strength and personality, contributing to the vibrant atmosphere of TJPW events. Manase's tenure in TJPW under the DDT umbrella showcased her development as a performer and her connection with the audience.​

Yukio Naya
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2019; active member of the roster.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card performer, involved in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based offense, utilizing his sumo background and imposing stature.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Sumo-style thrusts.
Brief description: Yukio Naya, grandson of the 48th yokozuna Taihō Kōki, transitioned from sumo to professional wrestling, bringing a unique blend of traditional sumo techniques and wrestling maneuvers. Since joining DDT in 2019, he has showcased his strength and agility, earning accolades such as the KO-D 8-Man Tag Team Championship and co-holding the Ironman Heavymetalweight Championship. In January 2024, Naya won the D-Oh Grand Prix 2023 tournament, solidifying his status as a rising star in the promotion. ​

Yusuke Kubo
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: 2006–2020, with regular appearances; currently active in Pro-Wrestling Basara.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer, often involved in tag team and faction-based matches.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a focus on submissions and strikes.
Signature moves: Various technical maneuvers, adapting to his opponents.
Brief description: Yusuke Kubo, also known as Goro Jr., began his career in DDT Pro-Wrestling in 2006. Throughout his tenure, he participated in numerous matches, showcasing his technical prowess. Kubo has also been active in Pro-Wrestling Basara, where he is a member of the "Iron Priest" stable and has held titles such as the Iron Fist Tag Team Championship and the Yokohama Shopping Street 6-Man Tag Team Championship. ​

Yusuke Okada
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Joined in 2021; active member of the roster.
Position on the card: Mid-card performer, involved in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-impact wrestling, emphasizing agility and precision.
Signature moves: Various, adapting to match context.
Brief description: Yusuke Okada transitioned to DDT Pro-Wrestling in 2021 after starting his career elsewhere. He quickly integrated into the roster, challenging for titles such as the DDT Universal Championship. Okada became a member of the reformed "Burning" stable, aligning with veterans like Jun Akiyama and Tetsuya Endo. He has also held the KO-D 6-Man Tag Team Championship, reflecting his growing prominence within the promotion. ​

Yuu
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Active from 2016 to 2019 through Tokyo Joshi Pro-Wrestling (TJPW), a DDT affiliate.
Position on the card: Main event performer in TJPW, involved in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse, utilizing judo techniques and strong strikes.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, various suplexes.
Brief description: Yuu, a former judo practitioner, brought her martial arts background into professional wrestling, debuting with TJPW in 2016. She quickly ascended the ranks, capturing the Princess of Princess Championship. Yuu's tenure in TJPW under the DDT umbrella showcased her dominance and versatility in the ring. She departed TJPW in 2019 to pursue opportunities internationally.​

Yuya Koroku
Time in DDT Pro-Wrestling: Debuted in 2021; active member of the roster.
Position on the card: Junior heavyweight, participating in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing speed and agility.
Signature moves: Various, adapting to match context.
Brief description: Yuya Koroku began his professional wrestling career with DDT in 2021. Despite his recent debut, he has shown promise with his athleticism and in-ring skills. Koroku's participation in matches alongside veterans indicates the promotion's investment in his development as a future star.



